Massachusetts, session 194th, S188.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 13 of chapter 142 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “thereof”, in line 9, the following 
words:- ; and provided further, that, notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, 
grounds for such variances by examiners may include the advancement of reductions in 
greenhouse gas emissions needed to advance the health of building occupants and reductions in 
greenhouse gas emissions needed to meet the statewide greenhouse gas emissions limits and 
sublimits established in chapter 21N. 
SECTION 2. Said section 13 of said chapter 142, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by inserting after the word “thereof”, in line 24, the following words:- ; provided, 
however, that notwithstanding any general or special law or rule or regulation to the contrary, 
grounds for making, altering, amending and repealing such rules and regulations may include the 

of 2 12 advancement of the health of building occupants and reductions in greenhouse gas emissions 
needed to meet the statewide greenhouse gas emissions limits and sublimits established pursuant 
to chapter 21N.